Maryland, session 2026, SB0371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–323.
(a) [(1)] A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
A person shall hold a discharge permit issued by the Department before the person may
construct, install, modify, extend, alter, or operate any of the following if its operation could
cause or increase the discharge of pollutants into the waters of this State:
[(i)] (1) An industrial, commercial, or recreational facility or
disposal system;
[(ii)] (2) A State–owned treatment facility; or
[(iii)] (3) Any other outlet or establishment.
[(2) A person shall hold a CAFO Discharge permit issued by the
Department before the person may begin construction on any part of a new CAFO.]
– 1 –

Ch. 253 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) IF THE GENERAL DISCHARGE PERMIT FOR ANIMAL FEEDING
OPERATIONS IS ADMINISTRATIVELY EXTENDED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE A PERSON TO BEGIN CONSTRUCTION ON ANY PART
OF A NEW ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATION UNDER AN APPROVAL PROCESS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT REQUIRES THE PERSON TO
DEMONSTRATE COMPLIANCE WITH:
(I) THE REQUIREMENTS FOR COVERAGE UNDER THE
ADMINISTRATIVELY EXTENDED GENERAL DISCHARGE PERMIT; AND
(II) ALL OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS AND
REQUIRED CONSTRUCTION PERMITS.
(b) By rule or regulation, the Department may require a discharge permit for any
other activity.
[(c) The Department may not issue a CAFO Discharge permit to a person that
violates subsection (a)(2) of this section.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –